src/morphology/stems/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON ProperNoun
Alakärppä+N+Prop:Alakärppä VNAME ;
Aquæ+N+Prop:Aquæ VNAME ;
Borsæ+N+Prop:Borsæ VNAME ;
Cannæ+N+Prop:Cannæ VNAME ;
Century+N+Prop:Century VNAME ;
Cumæ+N+Prop:Cumæ VNAME ;
Guaporé+N+Prop:Guaporé VNAME ;
Kolossæ+N+Prop:Kolossæ VNAME ;
Lambaréné+N+Prop:Lambaréné VNAME ;
Mahé+N+Prop:Mahé VNAME ;
Malé+N+Prop:Malé VNAME ;
Urbyæ+N+Prop:Ur^byæ VNAME ;
Yaoundé+N+Prop:Ya^oundé VNAME ;
